North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54C. Savings Banks.
Article 3. Corporate Changes.

§ 54C-30.
Conversion to savings bank.

An association or State or national bank, upon a majority vote of its board of directors, may apply to the Commissioner of Banks for permission to convert to a State savings bank and for certification of appropriate amendments to its certificate of incorporation to effect the change. Upon receipt of an application to convert to a State savings bank, the Commissioner of Banks shall examine all facts connected with the conversion. The depository institution applying for permission to convert shall pay all the expenses and cost of the examination.

The converting depository institution shall submit a plan of conversion as a part of the application to the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks may approve it with or without amendment. If the Commissioner of Banks approves the plan, then the plan shall be submitted to the members or stockholders as provided in subsection (c) of this section. If the Commissioner of Banks refuses to approve the plan, the objections shall be stated in writing and the converting depository institution shall be given an opportunity to amend the plan to obviate the objections or to appeal the Commissioner of Banks’ decision to the Commission.

After lawful notice to the members or stockholders of the converting depository institution and full and fair disclosure, the substance of the plan shall be approved by a majority of the votes or shares present, in person or by proxy. Following the vote of the members or stockholders, the results of the vote certified by an appropriate officer of the converting depository institution shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks shall then either approve or disapprove the requested conversion to a State savings bank. After approval of the conversion, the Commissioner of Banks shall supervise and monitor the conversion process and shall ensure that the conversion is conducted lawfully and under the approved plan of conversion.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 829, s. 7; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-31.
Conversion from State to federal charter.

A State savings bank, stock or mutual, organized and operated under this Chapter, may convert to a federal charter in accordance with the laws and regulations of the United States and with the same force and effect as though originally incorporated under these laws.
The procedure to effect this conversion is as follows:

The savings bank shall submit a plan of conversion to the Commissioner of Banks, who may approve the plan, with or without amendment, or refuse to approve the plan. If the Commissioner of Banks approves the plan, then the plan shall be submitted to the members or stockholders as provided in the subdivision (2) of this section. If the Commissioner of Banks refuses to approve the plan, the objections shall be stated in writing and the converting savings bank shall be given an opportunity to amend the plan to obviate the objections or to appeal the Commissioner of Banks’ decision to the Commission.

A meeting of the members or stockholders shall be held upon not less than 15 days’ notice to each member or stockholder. Notice of the meeting may be mailed to each member or stockholder, postage prepaid, to the last known address, or the board of directors may cause notice of the meeting to be published, once a week for two weeks preceding the meeting, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the savings bank has its principal office. It is regarded as sufficient notice of the purpose of the meeting if the notice contains substantially the following statement: “The purpose of this meeting is to consider the conversion of this State chartered savings bank to a federal charter, under the laws of the United States.” An appropriate officer of the savings bank shall make proof by affidavit at the meeting of due service of the notice or call for the meeting.

At the meeting of the members or stockholders of the savings bank, the members or stockholders may, by affirmative vote of a majority of votes or shares present, in person or by proxy, resolve to convert the savings bank to a federal charter. A copy of the minutes of the meeting of the members or stockholders certified by an appropriate officer of the savings bank shall be filed in the office of the Commissioner of Banks. The certified copy when so filed is prima facie evidence of the holding and the action of the meeting.

Within a reasonable time after the receipt of a certified copy of the minutes, the Commissioner of Banks shall either approve or disapprove the proceedings of the meeting for compliance with the procedure set forth in this section. If the Commissioner of Banks approves the proceedings, the Commissioner of Banks shall issue a certificate of approval of the conversion. The savings bank shall record the certificate in the office of the Secretary of State. If the Commissioner of Banks disapproves the proceedings, the Commissioner of Banks shall provide a written explanation of the disapproval and notify the savings bank of the disapproval. The savings bank may appeal a disapproval to the Commission.

The savings bank shall file an application, in the manner prescribed or authorized by the laws and regulations of the United States, to consummate the conversion to a federal charter. A copy of the charter or authorization issued to the savings bank by the appropriate federal regulatory authority shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. Upon filing with the Commissioner of Banks, the savings bank shall cease to be a State savings bank and shall be a federal depository institution.

Whenever any savings bank converts to a federal charter it shall cease to be a savings bank under the laws of this State, except that its corporate existence is deemed to be extended for the purpose of prosecuting or defending suits by or against it and of enabling it to close its business affairs as a State savings bank and to dispose of and convey its property. At the time when the conversion becomes effective all the property of the State savings bank including all its rights, title, and interest in and to all property of whatever kind, whether real, personal or mixed, and things in action, and every right, privilege, interest, and asset of any conceivable value or benefit then existing, belonging or pertaining to it, or which would inure to it, shall immediately by act of law and without any conveyance or transfer, and without any further act or deed, be vested in and become the property of the federal depository institution, which shall have, hold and enjoy the same in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the same was possessed, held, and enjoyed by the savings bank; and the federal depository institution as of the effective time of the conversion shall succeed to all the rights, obligations, and relations of the State savings bank.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-32.
Simultaneous charter and ownership conversion.

In the event of a State charter to federal charter conversion, when the form of ownership will also simultaneously be changed from stock to mutual, or from mutual to stock, the conversion shall proceed initially as if it involves only a charter conversion, under

G.S. 54C-31

. After the savings bank becomes a federal depository institution, then the federal regulatory authority shall govern the continuing conversion of the form of ownership of the newly converted depository institution.

In the event of a federal charter to State charter conversion, when the form of ownership will also simultaneously be changed from stock to mutual or from mutual to stock, the conversion shall proceed initially as if it involves only a charter conversion under

G.S. 54C-30

. After the federal depository institution becomes a State savings bank,

G.S. 54C-33

or

G.S. 54C-34

shall govern the continuing conversion of the form of ownership of the newly converted savings bank.

This section shall not apply to any simultaneous charter and ownership conversion accomplished in conjunction with a merger under

G.S. 54C-39

.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-33.
Conversion of mutual to stock savings bank.

A mutual savings bank may convert from mutual to the stock form of ownership as provided in this section.

A mutual savings bank may apply to the Commissioner of Banks for permission to convert to a stock savings bank and for certification of appropriate amendments to the savings bank’s certificate of incorporation. Upon receipt of an application to convert from mutual to stock form the Commissioner of Banks shall examine all facts connected with the requested conversion. The savings bank applying for permission to convert shall pay all expenses and cost of the examination, monitoring, and supervision.

The savings bank shall submit a plan of conversion as a part of the application to the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks may approve it with or without amendment, if it appears that:

After conversion the savings bank will be in sound financial condition and will be soundly managed;

The conversion will not impair the capital of the savings bank nor adversely affect the savings bank’s operations;

The conversion will be fair and equitable to the members of the savings bank and no person whether member, employee, or otherwise, will receive any inequitable gain or advantage by reason of the conversion;

The savings bank services provided to the public by the savings bank will not be adversely affected by the conversion;

The substance of the plan has been approved by a vote of two-thirds of the board of directors of the savings bank;

All shares of stock issued in connection with the conversion are offered first to the members of the savings bank; except that any one or more tax qualified employee stock benefit plans may first purchase in the aggregate not more than ten percent (10%) of the total offering of shares;

All stock shall be offered to members of the savings bank and others in prescribed amounts and otherwise under a formula and procedure that is fair and equitable and will be fairly disclosed to all interested persons; and

The plan provides a statement as to whether stockholders shall have preemptive rights to acquire additional or treasury shares of the savings bank.If the Commissioner of Banks approves the plan, then the plan shall be submitted to the members as provided in subsection (d) of this section. If the Commissioner of Banks refuses to approve the plan, the Commissioner of Banks shall state the objections in writing and give the converting savings bank an opportunity to amend the plan to obviate the objections or to appeal the Commissioner of Banks’ decision to the Commission.

After lawful notice to the members of the savings bank and full and fair disclosure, the substance of the plan shall be approved by a majority of the total votes that members of the savings bank are eligible and entitled to cast. The vote by the members may be in person or by proxy. Following the vote of the members, the results of the vote certified by an appropriate officer of the savings bank shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks shall then either approve or disapprove the requested conversion. After approval of the conversion, the Commissioner of Banks shall supervise and monitor the conversion process and shall ensure that the conversion is conducted lawfully and under the savings bank’s approved plan of conversion.

Any rules that the Commissioner of Banks may adopt to govern conversions shall equal or exceed the requirements for conversion, if any, imposed by the federal insurer of deposit accounts.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 829, s. 8; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-34.
Conversion of stock savings bank to mutual savings bank.

A stock savings bank organized and operating under this Chapter may, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Banks, convert to a mutual savings bank under this section. Any rules that the Commissioner of Banks may adopt governing the conversion of stock savings banks to mutual savings banks shall include requirements that:

The conversion neither impair the capital of the converting savings bank nor adversely affect its operations;

The conversion shall be fair and equitable to all stockholders of the converting savings bank;

The public shall not be adversely affected by the conversion;

Conversion of a savings bank shall be accomplished only under a plan approved by the Commissioner of Banks. The plan shall have been approved by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board of directors of the converting savings bank, after a full and fair disclosure to the stockholders, by an affirmative vote of a majority of the total votes that stockholders of the savings bank are eligible and entitled to cast; and

The plan of conversion provides that:

Deposit accounts be issued in connection with the conversion to the stockholders of the converting savings bank;

A uniform date be fixed for the determination of the stockholders to whom, and the amount to each stockholder of which, deposit accounts shall be made available; and

Deposit accounts so made available to stockholders be based upon a fair and equitable formula approved by the Commissioner of Banks and fully and fairly disclosed to the stockholders of the converting savings bank.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-35.
Merger of like savings banks.

Any two or more mutual savings banks or any two or more stock savings banks organized and operating, may merge or consolidate into a single savings bank. The procedure to effect the merger is as follows:

The directors, or a majority of them, of the savings banks that desire to merge may, at separate meetings, enter into a written agreement of merger signed by them and under the corporate seals of the respective savings banks specifying each savings bank to be merged and the savings bank that is to receive into itself the merging savings bank or banks, and prescribing the terms and conditions of the merger and the mode of carrying it into effect. The merger agreement may provide other provisions with respect to the merger as appear necessary or desirable, or as the Commissioner of Banks may require.

The merger agreement together with copies of the minutes of the meetings of the respective boards of directors verified by the secretaries of the respective savings banks shall be submitted to the Commissioner of Banks, who shall cause a careful investigation and examination to be made of the affairs of the savings banks proposing to merge, including a determination of their respective assets and liabilities. Each savings bank that is investigated and examined shall pay the cost and expense for the examination. If, as a result of the investigation, the Commissioner of Banks concludes that the members or stockholders of each of the savings banks proposing to merge will be benefited by the merger, the Commissioner of Banks shall, in writing, approve the merger. If the Commissioner of Banks deems that the proposed merger will not be in the interest of all members or stockholders of the savings banks so merging, the Commissioner of Banks shall, in writing, disapprove the merger. If the Commissioner of Banks approves the merger agreement, then it shall be submitted, within 45 days after notice to the savings banks of the approval, to the members or stockholders of each savings bank, as provided in subdivision (3) of this section. The savings bank may appeal the disapproval of the merger to the Commission.

A special meeting of the members or stockholders of each of the savings banks shall be held separately upon notice of not less than 20 days to members or stockholders of each savings bank. The notice of meeting shall specify the time, place, and purpose of such meeting. Notice shall be given to members of each mutual savings bank in accordance with the methods specified in its charter and bylaws and by one or more of the following methods: (i) personal service or (ii) postage prepaid mail to the last address of each member appearing upon the records of the savings bank. Provided; however, with respect to a merger of two mutual savings banks, as an alternative to the methods of notice specified above, the mutual savings bank which is to be the surviving savings bank of the proposed merger may provide the notice of meeting by publication of notice at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers in general circulation in the county or counties in which the savings bank has its principal and any branch offices. Notice shall be given to stockholders of each stock-owned savings bank in accordance with the method specified for a meeting of stockholders in its charter and bylaws. The secretary or other officer of each savings bank shall make proof by certification at such meeting of the due service of the notice or call for said meeting.

At separate meetings of the members or stockholders of the respective savings banks, the members or stockholders may adopt, by an affirmative vote of a majority of the votes or shares present, in person or by proxy, a resolution to merge into a single savings bank upon the terms of the merger agreement as shall have been agreed upon by the directors of the respective savings banks and as approved by the Commissioner of Banks. Upon the adoption of the resolution, a copy of the minutes of the proceedings of the meetings of the members or stockholders of the respective savings banks, certified by an appropriate officer of the merging savings banks, shall be filed in the office of the Commissioner of Banks. Within 15 days after the receipt of a certified copy of the minutes of the meetings, the Commissioner of Banks shall either approve or disapprove the proceedings for compliance with this section. If the Commissioner of Banks approves the proceedings, the Commissioner of Banks shall issue a certificate of approval of the merger. The certificate shall be filed and recorded in the office of the Secretary of State. When the certificate is so filed, the merger agreement shall take effect according to its terms and is binding upon all the members or stockholders of the savings banks merging, and it is deemed to be the act of merger of the constituent savings banks under the laws of this State, and the certificate or certified copy thereof is evidence of the agreement and act of merger of the savings banks and the observance and performance of all acts and conditions necessary to have been observed and performed precedent to the merger. Within 60 days after its receipt from the Secretary of State, the certified copy of the certificate shall be filed with the register of deeds of the county or counties in which the respective savings banks so merged have recorded their original certificates of incorporation. Failure to so file shall subject the savings bank to only a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100.00) to be collected by the Secretary of State. If the Commissioner of Banks disapproves the proceedings, the Commissioner of Banks shall issue a written statement of the reasons for the disapproval and notify the savings banks to that effect. The savings banks may appeal the disapproval to the Commission.

Upon the merger of any savings bank, as above provided, into another:

Its corporate existence is merged into that of the receiving savings bank; and all its right, title, interest in and to all property of whatsoever kind, whether real, personal or mixed, and things in action, and every right, privilege, interest or asset of any conceivable value or benefit then existing belonging or pertaining to it, or which would inure to it under an unmerged existence, shall immediately by act of law and without any conveyance or transfer, and without any further act or deed, be vested in and become the property of the receiving savings bank, which shall have, hold, and enjoy the same in its own right as fully and to the same extent as if the same were possessed, held, or enjoyed by the savings banks so merged; and the receiving savings bank shall absorb fully and completely the savings bank or banks so merged.

Its rights, liabilities, obligations, and relations to any person shall remain unchanged and the savings bank into which it has been merged shall, by the merger, succeed to all the relations, obligations, and liabilities as though it had itself assumed or incurred the same. No obligation or liability of a member, customer, or stockholder in a savings bank that is a party to the merger shall be affected by the merger, but obligations and liabilities shall continue as they existed before the merger, unless otherwise provided in the merger agreement.

A pending action or other judicial proceeding to which a savings bank that is so merged is a party, is not deemed to have abated or to have discontinued by reason of the merger, but may be prosecuted to final judgment, order, or decree in the same manner as if the merger had not been made; or the receiving savings bank may be substituted as a party to the action or proceeding, and any judgment, order, or decree may be rendered for or against it that might have been rendered for or against the other savings bank if the merger had not occurred.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Commissioner of Banks may waive any or all of the foregoing requirements upon finding that waiver would be in the best interest of the members or stockholders of the merging savings banks.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1995, c. 479, s. 5; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-36.
Simultaneous conversion/merger.

The Commissioner of Banks shall not approve any application for the conversion of a savings bank from mutual to stock form and its simultaneous (i) merger into a stock-owned savings institution or bank or (ii) acquisition by an operating financial institution holding company except as authorized in subsection (b) of this section. As used in this section, “simultaneous conversion/merger” shall mean a transaction in which the members of a mutual savings bank proposing to convert to stock form are offered the opportunity to purchase (i) stock in the savings institution or bank into which it will be merged or (ii) stock in the holding company by which it will be acquired.

The Commissioner of Banks shall approve a plan of simultaneous conversion/merger only if:

The transaction is proposed to address supervisory concerns of the Commissioner of Banks as to the safety and soundness of the mutual savings bank; or

The mutual savings bank:

Operates in a local market area in which long-term trends make reasonable growth, continued profitability, and safe and sound operation appear unlikely;

Furnishes evidence concerning its asset size, capital to assets ratio, and other factors, which may include a cost/benefit analysis, satisfactory to the Commissioner of Banks that a simultaneous conversion/merger is more likely than remaining independent, merging with a mutual institution, converting to stock ownership, or other alternatives available to the savings bank to result in deposit, credit, and other financial services being provided within the local community safely and soundly on a long-term basis; and

Furnishes evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner of Banks that no director, officer, or other person associated with the parties to the proposed transaction will receive benefits as a result of the simultaneous conversion/merger which in the aggregate exceed those permitted under the federal regulations governing similar transactions.

The Commissioner of Banks may adopt rules to govern simultaneous conversion/mergers, which rules shall contain restrictions or limitations which equal or exceed the limitations or restrictions contained in the rules of federal regulatory agencies governing similar transactions. No plan of a simultaneous conversion/merger shall be approved by the Commissioner of Banks unless it includes notification by first class mail to the members of the savings bank to be acquired explaining the plan including economic benefits or incentives to be received by officers and directors of the association, if any. Shares of stock in the acquiring entity purchased at a discount or otherwise by members of the savings bank as part of the simultaneous conversion/merger shall be without limitation on subsequent sales by such members: provided, however, rules adopted by the Commissioner of Banks may place limitations of the sale of such stock purchased by officers and directors of the savings bank.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1995, c. 479, s. 6; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-37.
Merger of mutual and stock savings banks.

Any two or more savings banks, when one or more is mutually owned and one or more is stock owned, may merge to form either a mutual or stock savings bank in separate conversion-merger proceedings or in simultaneous conversion-merger proceedings.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-38.
Simultaneous merger and conversion.

Any combination of associations and State savings banks may merge to form either an association or a State savings bank.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-39.
Merger of federal charters with State savings banks.

Any two or more depository institutions, when one or more is a State savings bank and one or more is a federal depository institution operating in North Carolina, may merge under either a State savings bank charter or a federal charter.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-40.
Merger of savings banks with banks and associations.

A State savings bank, upon a majority vote of its board of directors, may apply to the Commissioner of Banks for permission to merge with any bank, as defined in G.S. 53C-1-4(4), or any association, as defined in

G.S. 54B-4

.

The State savings bank shall submit a plan of merger as a part of the application to the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks may recommend approval of the plan of merger with or without amendment.If the Commissioner of Banks approves the plan, then the plan shall be submitted to the stockholders or members as provided in subsection (c) of this section. If the Commissioner of Banks refuses to approve the plan, the Commissioner of Banks shall state the objections in writing and give the merging savings bank an opportunity to amend the plan to obviate the objections or to appeal the Commissioner of Banks’ decision to the Commission.

After lawful notice to the stockholders or members of the savings bank and full and fair disclosure, the substance of the plan shall be approved by a majority of the total votes that stockholders or members of the savings bank are eligible and entitled to cast. The vote by the stockholders or members may be in person or by proxy. Following the vote of the stockholders or members, the results of the vote certified by an appropriate officer of the savings bank shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks shall then either approve or disapprove the requested merger.

A merger between a mutual savings bank and a mutual savings and loan association shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 54C-35

.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1995, c. 479, s. 7; 2001-193, s. 16; 2012-56, s. 43.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 43, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-1-4(4)” for “G.S. 53-1” in subsection (a).

§ 54C-41.
Voluntary dissolution by directors.

A State savings bank may be voluntarily dissolved by a majority vote of the board of directors when substantially all of the assets have been sold for the purpose of terminating the business of the savings bank or as provided in

G.S. 55-14-01

and when a certificate of dissolution is recorded in the manner required by this Chapter for the recording of certificates of incorporation.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-42.
Voluntary dissolution by stockholders or members.

At any annual or special meeting called for the purpose of dissolution, a savings bank may, by an affirmative vote, in person or by proxy, of at least two-thirds of the total number of shares or votes that all members or stockholders of the association are entitled to cast, resolve to dissolve and liquidate the savings bank and adopt a plan of voluntary dissolution. Upon adoption of the resolution and plan of voluntary dissolution, the members or stockholders shall proceed to elect not more than three liquidators who shall post bond as required by the Commissioner of Banks.
The liquidators shall have full power to execute the plan; and the procedure thereafter shall be as follows:

A copy of the resolution, certified by an appropriate officer of the savings bank, together with the minutes of the meeting of members or stockholders, the plan of liquidation, and an itemized statement of the savings bank’s assets and liabilities, sworn to by a majority of its board of directors, shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. The minutes of the meeting of members or stockholders shall be certified by an appropriate officer of the association, and shall set forth the notice given, the time of mailing thereof, the vote on the resolution, the total number of shares or votes that all members of the savings bank were entitled to cast thereon, and the names of the liquidators elected.

If the Commissioner of Banks finds that the proceedings are in accordance with this Chapter, and that the plan of liquidation is not unfair to any person affected, the Commissioner of Banks shall attach a certificate of approval to the plan and shall forward one copy to the liquidators and one copy to the savings bank’s federal deposit account insurance corporation. Once the Commissioner of Banks has approved the resolution and the plan of liquidation, it shall thereafter be unlawful for the savings bank to accept any additional deposit accounts or additions to deposit accounts or make any additional loans, but all its income and receipts in excess of actual expenses of liquidation of the savings bank shall be applied to the discharge of its liabilities.

The liquidating savings bank shall pay a reasonable compensation, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Banks, to the appointed liquidator.

The plan becomes effective upon the recording of the Commissioner of Banks’ certificate of approval in the manner required by this Chapter for the recording of the certificate of incorporation.

The liquidation of the savings bank is subject to the supervision and examination of the Commissioner of Banks.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-43.
Reports of voluntary dissolution.

Upon completion of liquidation, the liquidator shall file with the Commissioner of Banks a final report and accounting of the liquidation.
The Commissioner of Banks’ approval of the report shall operate as a complete and final discharge of the liquidator, the board of directors, and each member or stockholder in connection with the liquidation of the savings bank.
Upon approval of the report, the Commissioner of Banks shall issue a certificate of dissolution of the savings bank and shall record same in the manner required by this Chapter for the recording of certificates of incorporation.
The dissolution is effective upon the recording of the certificates of incorporation.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-44.
Stock dividends.

No dividend on stock shall be paid unless the savings bank has the prior written approval of the Commissioner of Banks, except as provided in any rules that the Commissioner of Banks may adopt.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-45.
Supervisory mergers, consolidations, conversions, and combination mergers and conversions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, in order to protect the public, including members, depositors, and stockholders of a State savings bank, the Commissioner of Banks, upon making a finding that a State savings bank is unable to operate in a safe and sound manner, may authorize or require a short form merger, consolidation, conversion, or combination merger and conversion of the State savings bank, or any other transaction, as to which the finding is made.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-46.
Interim savings banks.

Article 2 of this Chapter shall not apply to applications for permission to organize an interim State savings bank so long as the application is approved by the Commissioner of Banks.

Preliminary approval of an application for permission to organize an interim State savings bank is conditional upon the Commissioner of Banks’ approval of an application to merge the interim savings bank and an existing stock savings bank or on the Commissioner of Banks’ approval of any other transaction.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-47.
Conversion to bank.

A State savings bank, upon a majority vote of its board of directors, may apply to the Commissioner of Banks for permission to convert to a bank, as defined under G.S. 53C-1-4(4), or to a national bank or other form of depository institution and for certification of appropriate amendments to its certificate of incorporation to effect the change. Upon receipt of an application to so convert, the Commissioner of Banks shall examine all facts connected with the conversion, including receipt of approval of the converting institution’s plan of conversion by other federal or state regulatory agencies having jurisdiction over the institution upon completion of its conversion. The depository institution applying for permission to convert shall pay all the expenses and costs of examination.

The converting depository institution shall submit a plan of conversion as a part of the application to the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks may approve it with or without amendment. If the Commissioner of Banks approves the plan, then the plan shall be submitted to the members or stockholders as provided in subsection (c) of this section. If the Commissioner of Banks refuses to approve the plan, the Commissioner of Banks’ objections shall be stated in writing and the converting depository institution shall be given an opportunity to amend its plan to obviate the objections or to appeal the Commissioner of Banks’ decision to the Commission.

After lawful notice to the members or stockholders of the converting depository institution and full and fair disclosure, the substance of the plan shall be approved by the members or the shareholders at a duly called and properly convened meeting of the members or shareholders. Following the meeting of the members or shareholders, the results of the vote certified by an appropriate officer of the converting depository institution shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks shall then either approve or disapprove the requested conversion to a bank, national bank, or other form of depository institution. After approval of the conversion, the Commissioner of Banks shall supervise and monitor the conversion process and shall ensure that the conversion is conducted lawfully and under the approved plan of conversion.

History.

1993, c. 163, s. 6; 2001-193, s. 16; 2012-56, s. 44.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 44, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-1-4(4)” for “G.S. 53-1(1)” in subsection (a).

§§ 54C-48 through 54C-51.

Reserved for future codification purposes.